Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3930.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 123B.41, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 16. new text end new text begin Safe schools activities. new text end new text begin "Safe schools activities" means the student and staff safety measures authorized in section 126C.44, subdivision 4. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin [123B.442] SCHOOL SAFETY MEASURES. new text end new text begin (a) Each school year, the commissioner must allot to the school districts or intermediary service areas for the purposes of school safety activities authorized in section 123B.41, subdivision 16, the amount calculated under section 126C.44, subdivision 2e, for distribution to a respective nonpublic school located within that school district. new text end new text begin (b) A nonpublic school receiving funds under this section must annually prepare a report detailing its expenditures of these funds on qualifying school safety activities and provide that report to the school district making the allotment. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 123B.61, is amended to read: 123B.61 PURCHASE OF CERTAIN EQUIPMENT. new text begin (a) new text end The board of a district may issue general obligation certificates of indebtedness or capital notes subject to the district debt limits to: deleted text begin (a)deleted text end new text begin (1)new text end purchase vehicles, computers, telephone systems, cable equipment, photocopy and office equipment, technological equipment for instruction,new text begin public announcement systems, emergency communications devices, other equipment related to violence prevention and facility security,new text end and other capital equipment having an expected useful life at least as long as the terms of the certificates or notes; deleted text begin (b)deleted text end new text begin (2)new text end purchase computer hardware and software, without regard to its expected useful life, whether bundled with machinery or equipment or unbundled, together with application development services and training related to the use of the computer; and deleted text begin (c)deleted text end new text begin (3)new text end prepay special assessments. new text begin (b)new text end The certificates or notes must be payable in not more than 20 years and must be issued on the terms and in the manner determined by the board. The certificates or notes may be issued by resolution and without the requirement for an election. The certificates or notes are general obligation bonds for purposes of section 126C.55. new text begin (c)new text end A tax levy must be made for the payment of the principal and interest on the certificates or notes, in accordance with section 475.61, as in the case of bonds. The sum of the tax levies under this section and section 123B.62 for each year must not exceed the lesser new text begin of the sum new text end of the amount of the district's total operating capital revenue new text begin and safe schools revenue new text end or the sum of the district's levy in the general and community service funds excluding the adjustments under this section for the year preceding the year the initial debt service levies are certified. new text begin (d)new text end The district's general fund levy for each year must be reduced by the sum ofnew text begin :new text end (1) the amount of the tax levies for debt service certified for each year for payment of the principal and interest on the certificates or notes issued under this section as required by section 475.61deleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end (2) the amount of the tax levies for debt service certified for each year for payment of the principal and interest on bonds issued under section 123B.62deleted text begin ,deleted text end new text begin ;new text end and (3) any excess amount in the debt redemption fund used to retire bonds, certificates, or notes issued under this section or section 123B.62 after April 1, 1997, other than amounts used to pay capitalized interest. new text begin (e)new text end If the district's general fund levy is less than the amount of the reduction, the balance shall be deducted first from the district's community service fund levy, and next from the district's general fund or community service fund levies for the following year. new text begin (f)new text end A district using an excess amount in the debt redemption fund to retire the certificates or notes shall report the amount used for this purpose to the commissioner by July 15 of the following fiscal year. A district having an outstanding capital loan under section 126C.69 must not use an excess amount in the debt redemption fund to retire the certificates or notes. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective July 1, 2025. new text end Sec. 4. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 126C.44, is amended to read: 126C.44 SAFE SCHOOLS REVENUE. Subdivision 1. Safe schools revenue for school districts. A school district's safe schools revenue equals new text begin the sum of the district's safe schools aid and new text end its safe schools levy. Subd. 2. School district safe schools levy. A school district's safe schools levy equals new text begin the sum of new text end $36 times the district's adjusted pupil units for the school yearnew text begin and its intermediate school district safe schools levy under subdivision 3new text end . new text begin Subd. 2b. new text end new text begin Safe schools aid. new text end new text begin (a) For fiscal year 2026 and later, the safe schools aid for a district equals $36 times the district's adjusted pupil units for the school year. new text end new text begin (b) For fiscal year 2026 and later, the cooperative safe schools aid for a school district that is a member of a cooperative unit that enrolls students equals $15 times the district's adjusted pupil units for the school year. new text end new text begin Subd. 2c. new text end new text begin Safe schools revenue allocated to cooperative units. new text end new text begin Revenue raised under this section for cooperative units must be transferred to the intermediate school district or other cooperative unit of which the district is a member and used only for costs associated with safe schools activities authorized under subdivision 4, paragraph (a), clauses (1) to (11). If the district is a member of more than one cooperative unit that enrolls students, the district must designate one cooperative unit to receive cooperative safe schools revenue and report that information to the Department of Education in the form and manner specified by the commissioner. new text end new text begin Subd. 2d. new text end new text begin Safe schools revenue for a charter school. new text end new text begin (a) For fiscal year 2026 and later, safe schools revenue for a charter school equals $36 times the adjusted pupil units for the school year. new text end new text begin (b) The revenue must be reserved and used only for costs associated with safe schools activities authorized under subdivision 4, paragraph (a), clauses (1) to (11), or for building lease expenses not funded by charter school building lease aid that are attributable to facility security enhancements made by the landlord after February 1, 2025. new text end new text begin Subd. 2e. new text end new text begin Safe schools revenue for a nonpublic school. new text end new text begin For fiscal year 2026 and later, safe schools revenue for a nonpublic school equals $36 times the school's enrollment for the previous school year. The aid must be allotted according to section 123B.442. new text end Subd. 3. Safe schools revenue for intermediate school districts. A school district that is a member of an intermediate school district may include in its levy authority under this section the costs associated with safe schools activities authorized under this section for intermediate school district programs. This authority must not exceed the product of $15 and the adjusted pupil units of the member districts. This authority is in addition to any other authority authorized under this section. Revenue raised under this subdivision must be transferred to the intermediate school district. Subd. 4. Use of safe schools revenue. (a) Safe schools revenue must be reserved and used for directly funding the following purposes or for reimbursing the cities and counties who contract with the district for the following purposes: (1) to pay the costs incurred for the salaries, benefits, and transportation costs of peace officers and sheriffs for liaison in services in the district's schools; (2) to pay the costs for a drug abuse prevention program as defined in section 609.101, subdivision 3, paragraph (e), in the elementary schools; (3) to pay the costs for a gang resistance education training curriculum in the district's schools; (4) to pay the costs for security in the district's schools and on school property; (5) to pay the costs for other crime prevention, drug abuse, student and staff safety, voluntary opt-in suicide prevention tools, and violence prevention measures taken by the school district; (6) to pay costs for licensed school counselors, licensed school nurses, licensed school social workers, licensed school psychologists, and licensed alcohol and substance use disorder counselors to help provide early responses to problems; (7) to pay for facility security enhancements including laminated glass, public announcement systems, emergency communications devices, and equipment and facility modifications related to violence prevention and facility security; (8) to pay for costs associated with improving the school climate; (9) to pay costs for colocating and collaborating with mental health professionals who are not district employees or contractorsnew text begin or for school-linked behavioral health services delivered by telemedicinenew text end ; deleted text begin ordeleted text end (10) to pay for the costs of cybersecurity measures, including updating computer hardware and software, other systems upgrades, and cybersecurity insurance costsdeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; ornew text end new text begin (11) by board resolution, to transfer money into the debt redemption fund to pay, when due, the amounts needed to meet principal and interest payments on obligations issued under sections 123B.61 and 123B.62 for purposes in clause (8). new text end (b) For expenditures under paragraph (a), clause (1), the district must initially attempt to contract for services to be provided by peace officers or sheriffs with the police department of each city or the sheriff's department of the county within the district containing the school receiving the services. If a local police department or a county sheriff's department does not wish to provide the necessary services, the district may contract for these services with any other police or sheriff's department located entirely or partially within the school district's boundaries. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective for state aid for fiscal year 2026 and later. new text end Sec. 5. new text begin APPROPRIATION; SAFE SCHOOLS REVENUE.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Department of Education. new text end new text begin The sums indicated in this section are appropriated from the general fund to the Department of Education in the fiscal years designated. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Safe schools aid. new text end new text begin For safe schools aid under Minnesota Statutes, section 126C.44: new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin ....... new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2026 new text end new text begin $ new text end new text begin ....... new text end new text begin ..... new text end new text begin 2027 new text end